Florida, session 2026, SB1448.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 20 21 Section 1.âParagraph (e) of subsection (2), paragraph (b) 22 of subsection (4), and paragraph (b) of subsection (5) of 23 section 215.555, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 24 215.555âFlorida Hurricane Catastrophe Fund.â 25 (2)âDEFINITIONS.âAs used in this section: 26 (e)ââRetentionâ means the amount of losses below which an 27 insurer is not entitled to reimbursement from the fund. An 28 insurerâs retention shall be calculated as follows: 29 1.âThe board shall calculate and report to each insurer the 30 retention multiples for that year. For the contract year 31 beginning June 1, 2026 2005, the retention multiple must shall 32 be equal to $4.5 billion divided by the total estimated 33 reimbursement premium for the contract year; for subsequent 34 years, the retention multiple shall be equal to $4.5 billion, 35 adjusted based upon the reported exposure for the contract year 36 occurring 2 years before the particular contract year to reflect 37 the percentage growth in exposure to the fund for covered 38 policies since 2004, divided by the total estimated 39 reimbursement premium for the contract year. Total reimbursement 40 premium for purposes of the calculation under this subparagraph 41 shall be estimated using the assumption that all insurers have 42 selected the 90-percent coverage level. 43 2.âThe retention multiple as determined under subparagraph 44 1. shall be adjusted to reflect the coverage level elected by 45 the insurer. For insurers electing the 90-percent coverage 46 level, the adjusted retention multiple is 100 percent of the 47 amount determined under subparagraph 1. For insurers electing 48 the 75-percent coverage level, the retention multiple is 120 49 percent of the amount determined under subparagraph 1. For 50 insurers electing the 45-percent coverage level, the adjusted 51 retention multiple is 200 percent of the amount determined under 52 subparagraph 1. 53 3.âAn insurer shall determine its provisional retention by 54 multiplying its provisional reimbursement premium by the 55 applicable adjusted retention multiple and shall determine its 56 actual retention by multiplying its actual reimbursement premium 57 by the applicable adjusted retention multiple. 58 4.âFor insurers who experience multiple covered events 59 causing loss during the contract year, beginning June 1, 2005, 60 each insurerâs full retention shall be applied to each of the 61 covered events causing the two largest losses for that insurer. 62 For each other covered event resulting in losses, the insurerâs 63 retention shall be reduced to one-third of the full retention. 64 The reimbursement contract shall provide for the reimbursement 65 of losses for each covered event based on the full retention 66 with adjustments made to reflect the reduced retentions on or 67 after January 1 of the contract year provided the insurer 68 reports its losses as specified in the reimbursement contract. 69 (4)âREIMBURSEMENT CONTRACTS.â 70 (b)1.âThe contract shall contain a promise by the board to 71 reimburse the insurer for 45 percent, 75 percent, or 90 percent 72 of its losses and applicable loss adjustment expenses from each 73 covered event in excess of the insurerâs retention, plus 5 74 percent of the reimbursed losses to cover loss adjustment 75 expenses. For contracts and rates effective on or after June 1, 76 2026 2019, the loss adjustment expense included reimbursement 77 must be the lesser of 15 10 percent of the total subject losses 78 before reimbursement or the total subject actual loss adjustment 79 expenses the reimbursed losses. 80 2.âThe insurer must elect one of the percentage coverage 81 levels specified in this paragraph and may, upon renewal of a 82 reimbursement contract, elect a lower percentage coverage level 83 if no revenue bonds issued under subsection (6) after a covered 84 event are outstanding, or elect a higher percentage coverage 85 level, regardless of whether or not revenue bonds are 86 outstanding. All members of an insurer group must elect the same 87 percentage coverage level. Any joint underwriting association, 88 risk apportionment plan, or other entity created under s. 89 627.351 must elect the 90-percent coverage level. 90 3.âThe contract shall provide that reimbursement amounts 91 shall not be reduced by reinsurance paid or payable to the 92 insurer from other sources. 93 (5)âREIMBURSEMENT PREMIUMS.â 94 (b)âThe State Board of Administration shall select an 95 independent consultant to develop a formula for determining the 96 actuarially indicated premium to be paid to the fund. The 97 hurricane loss portion of the formula must be determined by 98 averaging the results of all the catastrophe models accepted by 99 the Florida Commission on Hurricane Loss Projection Methodology. 100 The formula must shall specify, for each zip code or other 101 limited geographical area, the amount of premium to be paid by 102 an insurer for each $1,000 of insured value under covered 103 policies in that zip code or other area. In establishing 104 premiums, the board shall consider the coverage elected under 105 paragraph (4)(b) and any factors that tend to enhance the 106 actuarial sophistication of ratemaking for the fund, including 107 deductibles, type of construction, type of coverage provided, 108 relative concentration of risks, and other such factors deemed 109 by the board to be appropriate. The formula may must provide for 110 a cash build-up factor. For the 2009-2010 contract year, the 111 factor is 5 percent. For the 2010-2011 contract year, the factor 112 is 10 percent. For the 2011-2012 contract year, the factor is 15 113 percent. For the 2012-2013 contract year, the factor is 20 114 percent. For the 2013-2014 contract year and thereafter, the 115 factor is 25 percent; however, the cash build-up factor must be 116 zero in the 2026-2027 contract year. The formula may provide for 117 a procedure to determine the premiums to be paid by new insurers 118 that begin writing covered policies after the beginning of a 119 contract year, taking into consideration when the insurer starts 120 writing covered policies, the potential exposure of the insurer, 121 the potential exposure of the fund, the administrative costs to 122 the insurer and to the fund, and any other factors deemed 123 appropriate by the board. The formula must be approved by 124 unanimous vote of the board. The board may, at any time, revise 125 the formula pursuant to the procedure provided in this 126 paragraph. 127 Section 2.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.